District of Columbia statutes.
22-601

Breaking and entering vending machines and similar devices.

Whoever in the District of Columbia breaks open, opens, or enters, without right, any parking meter, coin telephone, vending machine dispensing goods or services, money changer, or any other device designed to receive currency, with intent to carry away any part of such device or anything contained therein, shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not more than 3 years or to a fine of not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, or both.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 600, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 203
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 204, 60 DCR 2064
1981 Ed., § 22-3427.
1973 Ed., § 22-3427.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $3,000”.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 204 of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.